Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.08.070

Public hearing.

The charter commission shall hold at least one public hearing in the course of its deliberations, may hold committee meetings and may sponsor public forums and promote public education and discussion respecting its work.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.08.070.]